Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 29.
FILLING VACANCIES IN OFFICE.

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment was proposed by initiative petition and approved at the general election on Nov. 8, 1938, by a vote of 63,414 for and 56,947 against.

Cross References.

Election of Supreme Court Justices and Court of Appeals Judges, Ark. Const. Amend. 80, § 18.

§ 1. Elective offices — Exceptions.

Vacancies in the office of United States Senator, and in all elective state, district, circuit, county, and township offices except those of Lieutenant Governor, Member of the General Assembly and Representative in the Congress of the United States, shall be filled by appointment by the Governor.

Cross References.

Filling vacancies in state elective office, Ark. Const., Art. 6, § 22.

General Assembly, writs of election, Ark. Const., Art. 5, § 6.

§ 2. Ineligible persons — Nepotism.

The Governor, Lieutenant Governor and Acting Governor shall be ineligible for appointment to fill any vacancies occurring or any office or position created, and resignation shall not remove such ineligibility. Husbands and wives of such officers, and relatives of such officers, or of their husbands and wives within the fourth degree of consanguinity or affinity, shall likewise be ineligible. No person appointed under Section 1 shall be eligible for appointment or election to succeed himself.

§ 3. Violation of amendment — Compensation withheld.

No person holding office contrary to this amendment shall be paid any compensation for his services. Any warrant, voucher or evidence of indebtedness issued in payment for such services shall be void.

§ 4. Duration of term of appointee — Election to fill vacancy.

The appointee shall serve during the entire unexpired term in the office in which the vacancy occurs if such office would in regular course be filled at the next General Election if no vacancy had occurred. If such office would not in regular course be filled at such next general election the vacancy shall be filled as follows: At the next General Election, if the vacancy occurs four months or more prior thereto, and at the second General Election after the vacancy occurs if the vacancy occurs less than four months before the next General Election after it occurs. The person so elected shall take office on the 1st day of January following his election.

§ 5. Election to fill — Placing names on ballots.

Only the names of candidates for office nominated by an organized political party at a convention of delegates, or by a majority of all the votes cast for candidates for the office in a primary election, or by petition of electors as provided by law, shall be placed on the ballots in any election.